Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.730

Bonds—Issuance, sale, form, term, interest—Covenants—Use of proceeds.

For the purpose of financing the cost of any projects, the board is hereby authorized to adopt the resolution or resolutions and prepare all other documents necessary for the issuance, sale and delivery of the bonds or any part thereof at such time or times as it shall deem necessary and advisable. Said bonds:

(1) Shall not constitute

(a) An obligation, either general or special, of the state; or

(b) A general obligation of Washington State University or of the board;

(2) Shall be

(a) Either registered or in coupon form; and

(b) Issued in denominations of not less than one hundred dollars; and

(c) Fully negotiable instruments under the laws of this state; and

(d) Signed on behalf of the university by the president of the board, attested by the secretary or the treasurer of the board, have the seal of the university impressed thereon or a facsimile of such seal printed or lithographed in the bottom border thereof, and the coupons attached thereto shall be signed with the facsimile signatures of such president and secretary;

(3) Shall state

(a) The date of issue; and

(b) The series of the issue and be consecutively numbered within the series; and

(c) That, except as otherwise provided in subsection (8)(e) of this section, the bond is payable both principal and interest solely out of the bond retirement fund;

(4) Each series of bonds shall bear interest, payable either annually or semiannually, as the board may determine;

(5) Shall be payable both principal and interest out of the bond retirement fund;

(6) Shall be payable at such times over a period of not to exceed forty years from date of issuance, at such place or places, and with such reserved rights of prior redemption, as the board may prescribe;

(7) Shall be sold in such manner and at such price as the board may prescribe;

(8) Shall be issued under and subject to such terms, conditions and covenants providing for the payment of the principal thereof and interest thereon and such other terms, conditions, covenants and protective provisions safeguarding such payment, not inconsistent with RCW 28B.30.700 through 28B.30.780, and as found to be necessary by the board for the most advantageous sale thereof, which may include but not be limited to:

(a) A covenant that the building fees shall be established, maintained and collected in such amounts that will provide money sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on all bonds payable out of the bond retirement account, to set aside and maintain the reserves required to secure the payment of such principal and interest, and to maintain any coverage which may be required over such principal and interest;

(b) A covenant that a reserve account shall be created in the bond retirement fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on all bonds issued and a provision made that certain amounts be set aside and maintained therein;

(c) A covenant that sufficient moneys may be transferred from the Washington State University building account to the bond retirement account when ordered by the board of regents in the event there is ever an insufficient amount of money in the bond retirement account to pay any installment of interest or principal and interest coming due on the bonds or any of them;

(d) A covenant fixing conditions under which bonds on a parity with any bonds outstanding may be issued;

(e) A covenant to obligate, to pay the principal of or interest on the bonds, all or a component of the fees and revenues of Washington State University that are not subject to appropriation by the legislature and that do not constitute general state revenues as defined in Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution or general state revenues for the purpose of calculating statutory limits on state indebtedness pursuant to *RCW 39.42.060.

The proceeds of the sale of all bonds issued in accordance with this chapter shall be used solely for paying the costs of the projects, including costs of issuance and other financing costs. The Washington State University building account shall be credited with the investment income derived pursuant to RCW 43.84.080 on the investable balances of scientific permanent fund and agricultural permanent fund, less the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

[ 2009 c 499 s 9; 2002 c 238 s 302; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 50; 1985 c 390 s 43; 1972 ex.s. c 25 s 2; 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 28; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 102; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.730. Prior: 1961 ex.s. c 12 s 4. Formerly RCW 28.80.530.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 39.42.060 was repealed by 2009 c 500 s 13.

Severability—2002 c 238: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2002 c 238 s 307.]

Effective date—2002 c 238: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 28, 2002]." [ 2002 c 238 s 308.]

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Validation—Saving—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 232: See notes following RCW 39.52.020.